en: Window glass tint color: Blue; Bronze/Brown; Clear; Gray/Smoke; Green; Other
de: Farbtönung des Fensterglases: Blau; Bronze/Braun; Transparent; Grau/Rauch; Grün; Sonstige
sl-SI: Barva zatemnitve okenskega stekla: Modra; Bronasta/rjava; Prozorna; Siva/zatemnjena; Zelena; Drugo
pt-PT: Cor do vidro da janela: Azul; Bronze/castanho; Transparente; Cinzento/fumo; Verde; Outro
nb: Farge på vindusglass: Blå; Bronse/brun; Klar; Grå/sotet; Grønn; Annet
fr: Couleur de la teinte des vitres: Bleu; Bronze/marron; Transparent; Gris/fumé; Vert; Autre
th: สีของกระจกสีตัดแสงหน้าต่าง: สีน้ำเงิน; สีบรอนซ์/สีน้ำตาล; โปร่งใส; สีเทา/สีควันบุหรี่; สีเขียว; อื่นๆ
el: Χρώμα φιμέ τζαμιού: Μπλε; Μπρονζέ/Καφέ; Διάφανο; Γκρι/Φιμέ; Πράσινο; Άλλο
ro-RO: Culoare de nuanțare a geamului ferestrei: Albastru; Bronz/Maro; Clar; Gri/Fumuriu; Verde; Altele
vi: kính cửa sổ màu sắc: Màu xanh dương; Đồng/Nâu; Trong suốt; Xám/Khói; Màu xanh lá cây; Khác
pl: Kolor przyciemnienia szyby okiennej: Niebieski; Brązowy/brąz; Przezroczysty; Szary/dymiony; Zielony; Inny
lt-LT: Langų stiklo atspalvis: Mėlynas; Bronzinis / rudas; Skaidrus; Pilkas / dūminis; Žalias; Kita
da: Toningsfarve i vinduesglas: Blå; Bronze/brun; Gennemsigtig; Grå/røgfarvet; Grøn; Andet
ja: 窓ガラスの着色色: 青; ブロンズ/ブラウン; 透明; グレー/スモーク; 緑; その他
es: Color de tinte de vidrio para ventana: Azul; Bronce/marrón; Transparente; Gris/ahumado; Verde; Otro
pt-BR: Cor da película do vidro da janela: Azul; Bronze/Marrom; Transparente; Cinza/Fumê; Verde; Outro
sv: Färg på toning av fönsterglas: Blå; Brons/brun; Genomskinlig; Grå/rökfärgad; Grön; Övrigt
zh-CN: 车窗玻璃贴膜颜色: 蓝色; 古铜色/棕色; 透明; 灰色/烟熏色; 绿色; 其他
ru: Цвет тонировки стекла: Синий; Бронзовый/коричневый; Прозрачный; Серый/дымчатый; Зеленый; Другое
tr: Pencere camı renk tonu: Mavi; Bronz/Kahverengi; Şeffaf; Gri/Füme; Yeşil; Diğer
ko: 창유리 틴팅 색상: 파란색; 브론즈/브라운; 투명색; 회색/스모크; 녹색; 기타
it: Tinta del vetro della finestra: Blu; Bronzo/Marrone; Trasparente; Grigio/Fumé; Verde; Altro
bg-BG: Цвят на тонирането на стъклото: Синьо; Бронз/кафяво; Прозрачно; Сиво/опушено; Зелено; Друго
nl: Tintkleur vensterglas: Blauw; Brons/bruin; Transparant; Grijs/smoke; Groen; Overige
sk-SK: Farba tónovania okenného skla: Modrá; Bronzová/Hnedá; Číra; Sivá/Dymová; Zelená; Iná
hu: Ablaküveg festék színe: Kék; Bronz / Barna; Átlátszó; Szürke / Füst; Zöld; Egyéb
cs: Barva tónování okenního skla: Modrá; Bronzová/hnědá; Průhledné; Šedá/kouřová; Zelená; Jiné
hr-HR: Boja zatamnjenja prozorskog stakla: Plava; Brončana/smeđa; Prozirna; Siva/dimljena; Zelena; Ostalo
zh-TW: 窗戶玻璃隔熱紙顏色: 藍色; 古銅色/棕色; 透明; 灰色/燻黑; 綠色; 其他
fi: Ikkunalasin sävyn väri: Sininen; Pronssi/ruskea; Läpinäkyvä; Harmaa/savu; Vihreä; Muu